Tables/Contraction/de-g2.ctb
word und 136
always und 2-136
always abgerund 1-12-12346-1235-256-145
always abzurund 1-12-2-1356-1235-256-145
always aufgerund 2-16-12346-1235-256-145
always ausgerund 16-234-12346-1235-256-145
always aufrund 2-16-1235-256-145
always aufzurund 2-16-2-1356-1235-256-145
always autorund 16-2345-135-1235-256-145
always baurund 12-16-1235-256-145
always fundstell 124-256-145-2-13456
begword gerund 12346-1235-256-145
always gerundium 1245-12456-256-145-24-136-134
always geschunden 12346-156-256-145-14
always hohlrund 125-135-125-123-1235-256-145
begword unrund 256-1235-256-145
begword ungerund 256-12346-1235-256-145
always wohlgerund 2456-123-12346-1235-256-145
always zerschunden 1356-12456-156-256-145-14
sufword bund 12-256-145
sufword bundes 12-256-145-123456
prfword bund 12-256-145
prfword bunde 12-256-145-15
prfword bunden 12-256-145-14
prfword bundes 12-256-145-123456
always völkerbund 5-1236-13-12456-12-256-145
always zugbund 1356-136-1245-12-256-145
always diffundier 145-24-124-124-256-145-346-1235
before t always fundamen 124-256-145-1-134-14
before t always aufundamen 16-124-256-145-1-134-14
prfword fund 124-256-145
prfword funde 124-256-145-15
prfword funden 124-256-145-14
prfword fundene 124-256-145-14-15
prfword fundenem 124-256-145-14-12356
prfword fundenen 124-256-145-14-14
prfword fundener 124-256-145-14-12456
prfword fundenes 124-256-145-14-123456
prfword fundes 124-256-145-123456
prfword funds 124-256-145-234
prfword fundus 124-256-145-136-234
always gebunden 12346-12-256-145-14
sufword gesund 12346-234-256-145
always holunder 125-135-123-256-145-12456
sufword hund 125-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
before hilmnrsu sufword hunde 125-256-145-15 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always blindenhund 12-123-35-145-14-125-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always diensthund 145-346-1345-23456-125-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always flughund 124-123-136-1245-125-256-145
always hatzhund 125-1-2345-1356-125-256-145
always haushund 125-16-234-125-256-145
always heereshund 125-15-15-1235-123456-125-256-145
always hetzhund 125-15-2345-1356-125-256-145
always hirtenhund 125-24-1235-2345-14-125-256-145
always jagdhund 245-1-1245-145-125-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always kampfhund 13-1-134-1234-124-125-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always militärhund 134-24-123-24-2345-345-1235-125-256-145
always polizeihund 1234-135-123-24-1356-146-125-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always rettungshund 1235-15-2345-2345-136-234-125-256-145
always schweinehund 156-2456-1246-15-125-256-145
always windhund 2456-35-145-125-256-145
prfword hund 125-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
prfword hunde 125-256-145-15 shouldn't use the und-contraction
prfword hunden 125-256-145-14 shouldn't use the und-contraction
prfword hundes 125-256-145-123456 shouldn't use the und-contraction
prfword hunds 125-256-145-234 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always hundert 125-256-145-12456-2345 shouldn't use the und-contraction
prfword hunderte 125-256-145-12456-236 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always kund 13-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always mund 134-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
class tz tz
before tz begword abundan 1-12-256-145-235
before tz always redundan 1235-15-145-256-145-235
always rundbau 1235-256-145-12-16
always rundenspiel 1235-256-145-14-2-346
always rundfahrt 1235-256-145-2-1235-2345
always rundfunk 1235-256-145-124-256-13 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always rundgang 1235-256-145-1245-235-1245
always rundgäng 1235-256-145-1245-345-1345-1245
prfword rundgänge 1235-256-145-1245-345-1345-12346
always rundholz 1235-256-145-125-135-123-1356
always rundkurs 1235-256-145-13-136-1235-234
always rundrück 1235-256-145-1235-14
always rundschau 1235-256-145-156-16
always rundschleif 1235-256-145-156-123-146-124
always rundschreib 1235-256-145-156-12
always rundstab 1235-256-145-23456-1-12
always rundstäb 1235-256-145-23456-345-12
always rundturm 1235-256-145-2345-136-1235-134
always rundtürm 1235-256-145-2345-1256-1235-134
always endrund 14-145-1235-256-145
always erstrund 12456-23456-1235-256-145
always finalrund 124-35-25-1235-256-145
always funkrund 124-256-13-1235-256-145
always halbrund 125-25-12-1235-256-145
always hauptrund 125-1234-1235-256-145
always hinrund 125-35-1235-256-145
always kreisrund 13-1235-146-234-1235-256-145
always messerundgang 134-15-2346-15-1235-256-145-1245-235-1245
before g always messerundgän 134-15-2346-15-1235-256-145-1245-345-1345
always rückrund 1235-46-1235-256-145
always schlund 156-123-256-145
always schlussrund 156-123-136-2346-1235-256-145
sufword schrund 156-1235-256-145
always überrund 2-1256-1235-256-145
always vorrund 2-26-1235-256-145
always zweitrund 1356-2456-146-2345-1235-256-145
always zwischenrund 1356-2456-1235-256-145

always stundung 23456-256-145-136
always sstundung 234-23456-256-145-136

always umrund 136-134-1235-256-145
always undamenhaft 256-145-1-134-14-125-124
always undatier 256-145-1-2345-346-1235
always undefinier 256-145-15-124-35-346-1235
always undeformier 256-145-15-124-26-134-346-1235
always undeklarier 256-145-15-13-123-356-346-1235
always undeklinier 256-145-15-13-123-35-346-1235
always undekorier 256-145-15-13-26-346-1235
sufword undenk 256-145-14-13
always undetaillier 256-145-15-2345-1-24-12345-346-1235
always undeterminier 256-145-15-2345-12456-134-35-346-1235
always undeutbar 256-145-126-2345-12-1-1235
always undeutlich 256-145-126-2345-456
always undeutsch 256-145-156
before t begword undich 256-145-3456
always undifferenzier 256-145-24-124-124-12456-14-1356-346-1235
always undiplomat 256-145-24-1234-123-135-134-1-2345
always undiskut 256-145-24-234-13-136-2345
always undistanzier 256-145-24-23456-235-1356-346-1235
always undisziplinier 256-145-24-234-1356-24-1234-123-35-346-1235
always undogmat 256-145-135-1245-134-1-2345
always undokumentier 256-145-135-13-136-134-14-2345-346-1235
always undomestizier 256-145-135-134-15-23456-24-1356-346-1235
always undotier 256-145-135-2345-346-1235
always undramat 256-145-1235-1-134-1-2345
always undruck 256-145-46
always unduld 256-145-136-123-145
always undurch 256-2-1456
always vagabund 1236-1-1245-1-12-256-145
always wund 2456-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction

word unter 256
always unter 2-256
always eunter 15-2-256
sufword kunter 13-256-2345-12456 shouldn't use the unter-contraction
sufword kunterbunter 13-256-2345-12456-12-256-2345-12456
sufword munter 134-256-2345-12456 shouldn't use the unter-contraction
always aufmunter 2-16-134-256-2345-12456
always aufgemunter 2-16-12346-134-256-2345-12456
always aufzumunter 2-16-2-1356-134-256-2345-12456
always ermunter 12456-134-256-2345-12456
always putzmunter 1234-136-2345-1356-134-256-2345-12456

always virus =

word voll 12345
always voll 2-12345
prfword vollzug 2-12345-1356-136-1245
prfword vollzuge 2-12345-1356-136-12346
prfword vollzuges 2-12345-1356-136-1245-123456
always vollzugs 2-12345-1356-136-1245-234

word von 1236
always von 2-1236

word vor 26
always vor 2-26
always vorzugs 2-26-1356-136-1245-234
always vorzugstimme 2-26-1356-136-1245-23456-24-1346-15
always vorzugstimmen 2-26-1356-136-1245-23456-24-1346-14
always favorit 124-1-1236-26-24-2345 shouldn't use the vor-contraction

word wie 126
always wie 2-126
always geschwiegen 12346-156-2456-346-1245-14
midendword verschwieg 1236-12456-156-2456-346-1245
sufword verschwieg 36-156-2456-346-1245
always tätowier 2345-345-2345-135-2456-346-1235
always zwieback 1356-2456-346-12-1-46
always zwiebel 1356-2456-346-12-13456 shouldn't use the wie-contraction
always zwiefach 1356-2456-346-124-56
before t always zwiegespal 1356-2456-346-12346-234-1234-25
before t always zwiespal 1356-2456-346-234-1234-25
before t always zwiespäl 1356-2456-346-234-1234-345-123

word zu 1356
always zu 2-1356
always zucchini 1356-136-6-14-1456-35-24
sufword azur =
sufword mazurk =
word zug =
before konsonant always zug =
sufword anzuglied 235-2-1356-1245-123-346-145
sufword anzuglotz 235-2-1356-1245-123-135-2345-1356

always zugegen 2-1356-2-1245
always zugehör 2-1356-12346-125-246-1235
always zugleich 2-1356-1245-1456
always zugrenzen 2-1356-1245-1235-14-1356-14
always zugriff 2-1356-1245-1235-24-124-124
always zugabteil 1356-136-1245-1-12-2345-146-123
sufword zuganzahl 1356-136-1245-235-1356-123
always zugarbeit 1356-136-1245-356-12
always zugauflös 1356-136-1245-2-16-123-246-234
always zugaufsicht 1356-136-1245-2-16-234-3456-2345
always zugausfall 1356-136-1245-16-234-124-12345
always zugeinheit 1356-136-1245-1246-125
always zugeinricht 1356-136-1245-1246-2-3456
sufword zugeh 2-1356-1245-2356
always zugeigenschaft 1356-136-1245-146-1245-14-156
always zugeinsatz 1356-136-1245-1246-234-1356
always zugeinsätz 1356-136-1245-1246-5-234-1356
always zugeinwirk 1356-136-1245-1246-2456-13
always zugentfern 1356-136-1245-14-2345-124-12456-1345
always zugentführ 1356-136-1245-14-2345-124-125
always zugentgleis 136-136-1245-14-2345-1245-123-146-234
always zugentlast 1356-136-1245-14-2345-123-1-23456 shouldn't use the zu- nor ge-contraction
always zugentscheid 1356-136-1245-14-2345-156-146-145
before t always zugexper 1356-136-1245-15-6-1346-1234-12456
sufword zugig 1356-136-1245-45
always zugober 1356-136-1245-135-12-12456
always zugrunde 2-1356-1245-145-15
always zugüber 1356-136-1245-2-1256
always zugunglück 1356-136-1245-256-1245-46
always zugunter 1356-136-1245-2-256

prfword zupf =
prfword zupfe =
prfword zupfen 1356-136-1234-124-14
prfword zupfend 1356-136-1234-124-14-145
prfword zupfende 1356-136-1234-124-14-145-15
prfword zupfendem 1356-136-1234-124-14-145-12356
prfword zupfenden 1356-136-1234-124-14-145-14
prfword zupfender 1356-136-1234-124-14-145-12456
prfword zupfendes 1356-136-1234-124-14-145-123456
prfword zupfens 1356-136-1234-124-14-234
prfword zupfst 1356-136-1234-124-23456
prfword zupft 1356-136-1234-124-2345
prfword zupfte 1356-136-1234-124-236
prfword zupftem 1356-136-1234-124-2345-12356
prfword zupften 1356-136-1234-124-2345-14
prfword zupfter 1356-136-1234-124-2345-12456
prfword zupftes 1356-136-1234-124-2345-123456
prfword zupftest 1356-136-1234-124-236-23456
prfword zupftet 1356-136-1234-124-236-2345



always zucht 1356-136-1456-2345 shouldn't use the zu-contraction
always zuck 1356-136-46 shouldn't use the zu-contraction
before g always zug =
endword zug =
endword zuges 1356-136-1245-123456
always zunft 1356-256-124-2345
always zunter 1356-2-256
always zurr =

always bevorzugung 23-2-26-1356-136-1245-136

# Einformige Kürzungen, alleinstehend oder am Wortanfang
before e sufword ihr 24
before i sufword ihr 24
before e sufword sein 246
before i sufword sein 246
word war 356
sufword waren 356-14
word warst 356-23456
word wart 356-2345
word war's 356-6-234
word wär 5-356
word wäre 5-356-15
word wären 5-356-14
word wärest 5-356-15-23456
word wäret 5-356-15-2345
word wärst 5-356-23456
word wärt 5-356-2345
word wär's 5-356-6-234

# Einformige Kürzungen, alleinstehend, mit Endungen oder in Wortverbindungen
always hatt 125
always innehatt 35-1345-15-125 shouldn't use the eh-contraction
prfword manhattan 134-235-125-1-2345-2345-1-1345
always manhattan 134-235-125-1-2345-2345-235
always hätt 345
always haett 345
always welch 13456
